Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6812
Motor vehicle, defined.

Motor vehicle means any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer as defined in the Motor Vehicle Registration Act and subject to registration for operation on the highways.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 12.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.